Indiana, session 2026, HB1223.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 11-8-8-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.218-2025,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) Except as provided in section 22 of this
chapter, as used in this chapter, "sex or violent offender" means a
person convicted of any of the following offenses:
(1) Rape (IC 35-42-4-1).
(2) Criminal deviate conduct (IC 35-42-4-2) (before its repeal).
(3) Child molesting (IC 35-42-4-3).
(4) Child exploitation (IC 35-42-4-4(b) or IC 35-42-4-4(c)).
(5) Vicarious sexual gratification (including performing sexual
conduct in the presence of a minor) (IC 35-42-4-5).
(6) Child solicitation (IC 35-42-4-6).
(7) Child seduction (IC 35-42-4-7).
(8) Sexual misconduct with a minor (IC 35-42-4-9) as a Class A,
Class B, or Class C felony (for a crime committed before July 1,
2014) or a Level 1, Level 2, Level 4, or Level 5 felony (for a
crime committed after June 30, 2014), unless:
2026 IN 1223—LS 6522/DI 106


(A) the person is convicted of sexual misconduct with a minor
as a Class C felony (for a crime committed before July 1,
2014) or a Level 5 felony (for a crime committed after June
30, 2014);
(B) the person is not more than:
(i) four (4) years older than the victim if the offense was
committed after June 30, 2007; or
(ii) five (5) years older than the victim if the offense was
committed before July 1, 2007; and
(C) the sentencing court finds that the person should not be
required to register as a sex offender.
(9) Incest (IC 35-46-1-3).
(10) Sexual battery (IC 35-42-4-8).
(11) Kidnapping (IC 35-42-3-2), if the victim is less than eighteen
(18) years of age, and the person who kidnapped the victim is not
the victim's parent or guardian.
(12) Criminal confinement (IC 35-42-3-3), if the victim is less
than eighteen (18) years of age, and the person who confined or
removed the victim is not the victim's parent or guardian.
(13) Possession of child sex abuse material (IC 35-42-4-4(d) or
IC 35-42-4-4(e)).
(14) Promoting prostitution (IC 35-45-4-4) as a Class B felony
(for a crime committed before July 1, 2014) or a Level 4 felony
(for a crime committed after June 30, 2014).
(15) Promotion of human sexual trafficking under
IC 35-42-3.5-1.1.
(16) Promotion of child sexual trafficking under
IC 35-42-3.5-1.2(a).
(17) Promotion of sexual trafficking of a younger child (IC
35-42-3.5-1.2(c)).
(18) Child sexual trafficking (IC 35-42-3.5-1.3).
(19) Human trafficking under IC 35-42-3.5-1.4 if the victim is
less than eighteen (18) years of age.
(20) Murder (IC 35-42-1-1).
(21) Voluntary manslaughter (IC 35-42-1-3).
(22) Sexual misconduct by a service provider with a detained or
supervised child (IC 35-44.1-3-10(c)).
(23) An offense that resulted in serious bodily injury or death
to a law enforcement officer acting within the scope of the
officer's employment.
(b) The term includes:
(1) a person who is required to register as a sex or violent
2026 IN 1223—LS 6522/DI 106


offender in any jurisdiction; and
(2) a child who has committed a delinquent act, or a person
prosecuted under IC 31-30-1-4(d) for an offense described in
subsection (a) committed when the person was less than eighteen
(18) years of age, but who was at least twenty-one (21) years of
age when the charge was filed, and who:
(A) is at least fourteen (14) years of age;
(B) is on probation, is on parole, is discharged from a facility
by the department of correction, is discharged from a secure
private facility (as defined in IC 31-9-2-115), or is discharged
from a juvenile detention facility as a result of an adjudication
as a delinquent child for an act that would be an offense
described in subsection (a) if committed by an adult; and
(C) is found by a court by clear and convincing evidence to be
likely to repeat an act that would be an offense described in
subsection (a) if committed by an adult.
(c) In making a determination under subsection (b)(2)(C), the court
shall consider expert testimony concerning whether a child is likely to
repeat an act that would be an offense described in subsection (a) if
committed by an adult.
(d) A person ordered to register under subsection (b)(2) may
petition the court to reconsider the order at any time after completing
court ordered sex offender treatment. The court shall consider expert
testimony concerning whether a child or person is likely to repeat an
offense described in subsection (a) or an act that would be an offense
described in subsection (a) if committed by an adult.
SECTION 2. IC 35-33-8-3.4, AS ADDED BY P.L.197-2025,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3.4. (a) This section applies only to a violent
arrestee. or a repeat violent arrestee.
(b) The following definitions apply throughout this section:
(1) "Crime of violence" means an offense:
(A) described in IC 35-50-1-2(a); and
(B) that is a Level 1, Level 2, Level 3, Level 4, or Level 5
felony.
(2) "Repeat violent arrestee" means a person arrested for or
charged with a crime of violence who has a prior conviction for
a crime of violence.
(3) "Violent arrestee" means a person arrested for or charged with
a crime of violence.
(c) A violent arrestee or a repeat violent arrestee may only be
released on bail set individually by the court following a hearing held
2026 IN 1223—LS 6522/DI 106


in open court. Before releasing a violent arrestee or a repeat violent
arrestee on bail the court must:
(1) review the probable cause affidavit or arrest warrant; and
(2) impose money bail payable by surety bond or cash deposit.
However, if the violent arrestee is charged with an offense that
resulted in serious bodily injury or death to a law enforcement
officer, the court may only impose money bail payable by cash
deposit.
(d) In accordance with IC 27-10-2-4.5(g)(2), a charitable bail
organization may not pay money bail imposed under this section on
behalf of a violent arrestee. or a repeat violent arrestee.
SECTION 3. IC 35-38-1-7.1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.218-2025,
SECTION 16, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7.1. (a) In determining what sentence to impose
for a crime, the court may consider the following aggravating
circumstances:
(1) The harm, injury, loss, or damage suffered by the victim of an
offense was:
(A) significant; and
(B) greater than the elements necessary to prove the
commission of the offense.
(2) The person has a history of criminal or delinquent behavior.
(3) The victim of the offense was less than twelve (12) years of
age or at least sixty-five (65) years of age at the time the person
committed the offense.
(4) The person:
(A) committed a crime of violence (IC 35-50-1-2); and
(B) knowingly committed the offense in the presence or within
hearing of an individual who:
(i) was less than eighteen (18) years of age at the time the
person committed the offense; and
(ii) is not the victim of the offense.
(5) The person violated a protective order issued against the
person under IC 34-26-5 (or IC 31-1-11.5, IC 34-26-2, or
IC 34-4-5.1 before their repeal), a workplace violence restraining
order issued against the person under IC 34-26-6, or a no contact
order issued against the person.
(6) The person has recently violated the conditions of any
probation, parole, pardon, community corrections placement, or
pretrial release granted to the person.
(7) The victim of the offense was:
(A) a person with a disability (as defined in IC 27-7-6-12), and
2026 IN 1223—LS 6522/DI 106


the defendant knew or should have known that the victim was
a person with a disability; or
(B) mentally or physically infirm.
(8) The person was in a position having care, custody, or control
of the victim of the offense.
(9) The injury to or death of the victim of the offense was the
result of shaken baby syndrome (as defined in IC 16-41-40-2) or
abusive head trauma.
(10) The person threatened to harm the victim of the offense or a
witness if the victim or witness told anyone about the offense.
(11) The person:
(A) committed trafficking with an inmate under
IC 35-44.1-3-5; and
(B) is an employee of the penal facility.
(12) The person committed the offense with bias due to the
victim's or the group's real or perceived characteristic, trait, belief,
practice, association, or other attribute the court chooses to
consider, including but not limited to an attribute described in
IC 10-13-3-1.
(13) The person is or has been an alien (as defined by 8 U.S.C.
1101(a)) unlawfully present in the United States. A determination
by the United States Department of Homeland Security that an
alien has come to, entered, or remained in the United States in
violation of law is evidence that the alien is or has been
unlawfully present in the United States.
(14) The offense involved dealing in a controlled substance under
IC 35-48-4 and the person distributed the controlled substance to
at least three (3) different individuals in a one hundred eighty
(180) day period.
(15) The offense resulted in serious bodily injury or death to
a law enforcement officer.
(b) The court may consider the following factors as mitigating
circumstances or as favoring suspending the sentence and imposing
probation:
(1) The crime neither caused nor threatened serious harm to
persons or property, or the person did not contemplate that it
would do so.
(2) The crime was the result of circumstances unlikely to recur.
(3) The victim of the crime induced or facilitated the offense.
(4) There are substantial grounds tending to excuse or justify the
crime, though failing to establish a defense.
(5) The person acted under strong provocation.
2026 IN 1223—LS 6522/DI 106


(6) The person has no history of delinquency or criminal activity,
or the person has led a law-abiding life for a substantial period
before commission of the crime.
(7) The person is likely to respond affirmatively to probation or
short term imprisonment.
(8) The character and attitudes of the person indicate that the
person is unlikely to commit another crime.
(9) The person has made or will make restitution to the victim of
the crime for the injury, damage, or loss sustained.
(10) Imprisonment of the person will result in undue hardship to
the person or the dependents of the person.
(11) The person was convicted of a crime involving the use of
force against a person who had repeatedly inflicted physical or
sexual abuse upon the convicted person and evidence shows that
the convicted person suffered from the effects of battery as a
result of the past course of conduct of the individual who is the
victim of the crime for which the person was convicted.
(12) The person was convicted of a crime relating to a controlled
substance and the person's arrest or prosecution was facilitated in
part because the person:
(A) requested emergency medical assistance; or
(B) acted in concert with another person who requested
emergency medical assistance;
for an individual who reasonably appeared to be in need of
medical assistance due to the use of alcohol or a controlled
substance.
(13) The person has posttraumatic stress disorder, traumatic brain
injury, or a postconcussive brain injury.
(14) The person is a person described in IC 31-30-1-4(d) who
committed the offense while the person was a child but is now at
least twenty-one (21) years of age.
(15) The offense involved a controlled substance under
IC 35-48-4 and the person:
(A) sought treatment:
(i) in the three hundred sixty-five (365) day period
preceding the date of the commission of the offense; or
(ii) on or after the date on which the person committed the
offense, but before sentencing; and
(B) successfully completed treatment:
(i) in the three hundred sixty-five (365) day period
preceding the date of the commission of the offense; or
(ii) on or after the date on which the person committed the
2026 IN 1223—LS 6522/DI 106


offense, but before sentencing.
(c) The criteria listed in subsections (a) and (b) do not limit the
matters that the court may consider in determining the sentence.
However, in determining the sentence for a crime that resulted in
serious bodily injury or death to a law enforcement officer, the
court may not consider time spent by the defendant in pretrial
detention or home detention or on work release.
(d) A court may impose any sentence that is:
(1) authorized by statute; and
(2) permissible under the Constitution of the State of Indiana;
regardless of the presence or absence of aggravating circumstances or
mitigating circumstances.
(e) If a court suspends a sentence and orders probation for a person
described in subsection (b)(13), the court may require the person to
receive treatment for the person's injuries.
2026 IN 1223—LS 6522/DI 106